Wyoming, session 2025, HB0221.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 105,
Section 4 is amended to read:

Section 4. This act is effective
not later than fifteen (15) days after
applicable federal law is enacted and
HB0221

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0670
the attorney general certifies to the
secretary of state that federal law has
been enacted that aligns with the
purposes of this act. If no federal law
is enacted that aligns with the
purposes of this act, this act is
effective January 1, 2026.

Section 2. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 105,
Section 5 is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0221